Utah statutes.
63F-1-404.   Duties of the division.

The division shall:

(1)  develop and implement an effective enterprise architecture governance model for the executive branch;

(2)  provide oversight of information technology projects that impact statewide information technology services, assets, or functions of state government to:

(a)  control costs;

(b)  ensure business value to a project;

(c)  maximize resources;

(d)  ensure the uniform application of best practices; and

(e)  avoid duplication of resources;

(3)  develop a method of accountability to agencies for services provided by the division through service agreements with the agencies;

(4)  beginning September 1, 2006, and each September 1 thereafter, provide the chief information officer and the Public Utilities and Technology Interim Committee with performance measures used by the division to measure the quality of service delivered by the division and the results of the performance measures;

(5)  serve as a project manager for enterprise architecture which includes the management of applications, standards, and procurement of enterprise architecture;

(6)  coordinate the development and implementation of advanced state telecommunication systems;

(7)  provide services including technical assistance:

(a)  to executive branch agencies and subscribers to the services; and

(b)  related to information technology or telecommunications;

(8)  establish telecommunication system specifications and standards for use by:

(a)  one or more executive branch agencies; or

(b)  one or more entities that subscribe to the telecommunication systems in accordance with Section 63F-1-303;

(9)  coordinate state telecommunication planning in cooperation with:

(a)  state telecommunication users;

(b)  executive branch agencies; and

(c)  other subscribers to the state's telecommunication systems;

(10)  cooperate with the federal government, other state entities, counties, and municipalities in the development, implementation, and maintenance of:

(a) (i)  governmental information technology; or

(ii)  governmental telecommunication systems; and

(b) (i)  as part of a cooperative organization; or

(ii)  through means other than a cooperative organization;

(11)  establish, operate, manage, and maintain:

(a)  one or more state data centers; and

(b)  one or more regional computer centers;

(12)  design, implement, and manage all state-owned, leased, or rented land, mobile, or radio telecommunication systems that are used in the delivery of services for state government or its political subdivisions;

(13)  in accordance with the executive branch strategic plan, implement minimum standards to be used by the division for purposes of compatibility of procedures, programming languages, codes, and media that facilitate the exchange of information within and among telecommunication systems; and

(14)  provide the chief information officer with an analysis of an executive branch agency information technology plan that includes:

(a)  an assessment of how the implementation of the agency information technology plan will affect the costs, operations, and services of:

(i)  the department; and

(ii)  other executive branch agencies; and

(b)  any recommended changes to the plan.



Amended by Chapter 270, 2011 General Session

